Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-522
Judgments; installment payments; financial responsibility; license or registration; restore.

The department shall not suspend a license, registration or a nonresident's operating privilege, and shall restore any license, registration or nonresident's operating privilege suspended following nonpayment of a judgment, when the judgment debtor gives proof of financial responsibility and obtains such an order permitting the payment of such judgment in installments, and while the payment of any said installment is not in default.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 22, p. 492.